Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) Subject to amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department of social and health services shall establish a pilot program as described in this section to allow certain clients with developmental disabilities who live in community settings to access dental services at the Rainier school.(2) To be eligible for services under the pilot, a person must have been determined to be eligible for developmental disabilities services through the department of social and health services, and:(a) Have been assessed as having a high behavior acuity level, a high medical acuity level, or both, according to the developmental disabilities assessment;(b) Have a documented medical history requiring general anesthesia or deep sedation to facilitate routine medical or dental treatment; or(c) Have certification by the person's case manager that community dental care is unavailable due to the person's specific medical or behavioral profile.(3) Dental visits may include short-term admission of no more than 24 hours. Pilot participants may use available respite hours for dental visits if authorized under the participant's home and community-based services waiver.(4) The department of social and health services shall work with the health care authority to enroll the dental clinic at the Rainier school as a medicaid fee-for-service provider for the dental services provided under the pilot. Any federal matching funds for services provided under the pilot must be deposited into the state general fund.(5) The pilot shall conclude by July 1, 2028. By October 1, 2028, the department of social and health services shall submit a report to the legislature, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, detailing the outcome of the pilot. The report must include:(a) The number of people served by the pilot;(b) A description of successes of, and obstacles encountered by, the pilot;(c) A description of any administrative or billing complications, with suggestions as to how to resolve these complications; and(d) Perceived ongoing need for this service model to serve this population.(6) This section expires July 1, 2029.Sec. 2. RCW 71A.20.191 and 2025 c 410 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, as of July 27, 2025, no new long-term admissions are permitted at the Rainier school, located at Buckley, Pierce county.(b) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and section 1 of this act, as of June 30, 2027, no admissions of any kind are permitted at the Rainier school, located at Buckley, Pierce county.(2) Until the conditions in subsection (5) of this section are met, a former long-term resident of the Rainier school who moves to a community-based setting after July 27, 2025, shall be offered the right to return to the Rainier school once during the first year following their move to the community and this shall not be considered a new admission for purposes of subsection (1) of this section. If a former resident of the Rainier school exercises the right to return established in this subsection (2), any additional request to return to the Rainier school after a second move to the community shall be reviewed by the department and must be approved by the secretary, based on the recommendation from a multidisciplinary care team. In addition to the right to return established in this subsection (2), any former resident of the Rainier school maintains the right to return to a residential habilitation center established in RCW 71A.18.040 and the right to residential habilitation center services when determined eligible.(3)(a) The department shall:(i) Provide state-operated living alternatives to residential habilitation center residents transitioning to the community from the Rainier school who prefer a state-operated community residential service;(ii) Use supported living program and adult family home capacity in the community for residents of the Rainier school who prefer and choose these settings;(iii) Provide space at other residential habilitation centers to residents of the Rainier school who prefer a different residential habilitation center setting; and(iv) Offer employees of the Rainier school opportunities to work in state-operated living alternatives and other state facilities and programs.(b) Sufficient funding shall be appropriated to the department to fulfill the requirements of this subsection (3).(4) When assisting individuals who are transitioning out of the Rainier school the department shall:(a) Offer each individual resident a meaningful choice of appropriate alternative placements;(b) Prioritize client choice, autonomy, individual preferences, medical and behavioral health care needs, and opportunities for community integration;(c) Develop individualized transition plans in collaboration with each resident and their family or legal guardian, caregivers, and support providers;(d) Coordinate closely with other state agencies, local entities, health care providers, and community stakeholders to ensure seamless transitions;(e) Provide or contract for all necessary assessments, planning, relocation expenses, housing modifications, staff training, crisis support, and related transition activities; and(f) Implement robust oversight and accountability measures related to the transitions, and regularly monitor transition outcomes, as well as individual well-being and satisfaction.(5) The Rainier school, located at Buckley, Pierce county shall continue to operate as a residential habilitation center until such time that the census of long-term residents has reached zero persons.(6) "Closure" for purposes of chapter 410, Laws of 2025 means prohibiting new admissions as described in subsection (1) of this section.--- END ---